New York, session 2025-2026, A10593.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "state workforce fuel reduction and conservation act". 3 § 2. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 201-b to 4 read as follows: 5 § 201-b. State workforce fuel reduction and conservation act. 1. 6 There shall be created within the office of general services a state 7 workforce fuel reduction and conservation program, which shall have the 8 purpose of developing and assisting in the implementation of strategies 9 to reduce gasoline consumption by the state's motor vehicular fleet, and 10 to reduce gasoline consumption through solo motor vehicle trips between 11 home and the workplace by state employees and state contractors. 12 2. The office of general services, in coordination with the governor's 13 office of employee relations and the office for technology, shall issue 14 a report to the governor and the legislature on or before November 15 fifteenth, two thousand twenty-seven, setting forth a specific plan to 16 reduce the number of solo motor vehicle trips between home and the work- 17 place by state employees and state contractors. Such plan shall include, 18 at a minimum, proposals to promote the use of transportation other than 19 via single occupancy vehicles by state employees to and from the work- 20 place, and while at the workplace: proposals for the development, 21 promotion and implementation of a solo trip reduction program designed 22 to encourage state employees and state contractors to use an alternative 23 mode of commuting such as car or van pools, mass transit, biking or 24 walking; authorizing state agencies and authorities to permit alterna- 25 tive work schedules or telecommuting for all state employees and 26 contractors where doing so would result in a reduction in home-workplace 27 travel without decreasing employee efficiency; and a proposal to reim- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06141-03-6 A. 10593 2 1 burse state employees and contractors for mass transit costs where doing 2 so results in a net reduction in solo motor vehicle trips. 3 3. The office of general services shall review the size of the state's 4 vehicular fleet, the policies governing the use of such fleet and the 5 actual use of such fleet, and shall issue to the governor and the legis- 6 lature on or before November fifteenth, two thousand twenty-seven, a 7 specific plan to reduce the use of such fleet in order to reduce gaso- 8 line consumption. 9 § 3. Each state agency covered by section 201-b of the executive law, 10 establishing a program to increase the average passenger occupancy per 11 vehicle in commuting trips between home and the workplace, shall report 12 to the office of general services on the status of such program within 13 one hundred eighty days of the effective date of this act, and on the 14 fifteenth day of January in each year thereafter. 15 § 4. Each state agency that maintains its own vehicular fleet shall 16 perform a fuel efficiency audit of such fleet and shall provide such 17 audit to the office of general services within one hundred eighty days 18 of the effective date of this act. 19 § 5. The department of motor vehicles shall develop programs to 20 educate the driving public on "smart driving," trip reduction and vehi- 21 cle maintenance practices that are designed to maximize vehicle fuel 22 efficiency. The department shall issue a report to the governor and the 23 legislature on or before November 15, 2027 on the status of such 24 program. 25 § 6. Nothing in this act shall impair any agreements which may be made 26 as a result of collective bargaining or other negotiations between the 27 state and its affected employee organizations. 28 § 7. This act shall take effect immediately.